Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2448YC (2) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 27A.1A Participation in federal 1 immigration program. 2 Not later than January 1, 2026, every law enforcement agency 3 in the state shall enter into written memorandums of agreement 4 with United States immigration and customs enforcement to 5 participate in the immigration programs established under 6 section 287(g) of the federal Immigration and Nationality 7 Act, 8 U.S.C. Â§1357(g). Every law enforcement agency shall 8 enter into written memorandums of agreement for both the jail 9 enforcement model and the warrant service officer program. 10 Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 11 3, shall not apply to this Act. 12